Utah statutes.
63M-1-1802.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development Board.
(2)  "Dollars left in the state" means expenditures made in the state for a
state-approved production, including:
(a)  an expenditure that is subject to:
(i)  a corporate franchise or income tax under Title 59, Chapter 7, Corporate
Franchise and Income Taxes;
(ii)  an individual income tax under Title 59, Chapter 10, Individual Income
Tax Act; and
(iii)  a sales and use tax under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act,
notwithstanding any sales and use tax exemption allowed by law;
(b)  payments made to a nonresident only to the extent of the income tax paid
to the state on the payments, the amount of per diems paid, and other direct
reimbursements transacted in the state; and
(c)  payments made to a payroll company or loan-out corporation that is
registered to do business in the state, only to the extent of the amount of
withholding under Section 59-10-402.
(3)  "Loan-out corporation" means a corporation owned by one or more artists
that provides services of the artists to a third party production company.
(4)  "Motion picture company" means a company engaged in the production of:
(a)  motion pictures;
(b)  television series; or
(c)  made-for-television movies.
(5)  "Motion picture incentive" means either a cash rebate from the Motion
Picture Incentive Account or a refundable tax credit under Section 59-7-614.5
or 59-10-1108.
(6)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development.
(7)  "Payroll company" means a business entity that handles the payroll and
becomes the employer of record for the staff, cast, and crew of a motion
picture production.
(8)  "Refundable tax credit" means a refundable motion picture tax credit
authorized under Section 63M-1-1803 and claimed under Section 59-7-614.5 or
59-10-1108.
(9)  "Restricted account" means the Motion Picture Incentive Account created
in Section 63M-1-1803.
(10)  "State-approved production" means a motion picture, television series,
or made-for-television movie approved by the administrator and ratified by the
board that is produced in the state by a motion picture company.
(11)  "Tax credit amount" means the amount the office lists as a tax credit on
a tax credit certificate for a taxable year.
(12)  "Tax credit certificate" means a certificate issued by the office that:
(a)  lists the name of the applicant;
(b)  lists the applicant's taxpayer identification number;
(c)  lists the amount of tax credit that the office awards the applicant for
the taxable year; and
(d)  may include other information as determined by the office.
